Maine, session 132, LD195.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §13100-A is enacted to read:
§13100-A. Small Business Capital Savings Account Program
1. Program established. The Small Business Capital Savings Account Program is
established within and administered by the department to certify businesses as eligible for
a tax deduction under Title 36, section 5122, subsection 2, paragraph AAA or Title 36,
section 5200-A, subsection 2, paragraph JJ for contributions made to small business capital
savings accounts.
2. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Capital expenditure" means an expenditure for the acquisition of items that are
depreciable under the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, Sections 167 and
168.
B. "Eligible small business" means a business that:
(1) Is subject to taxation under Title 36, Part 8;
(2) Has its business headquarters in the State;
(3) Is taxed as a C corporation, an S corporation, a partnership or a sole
proprietorship for federal income tax purposes;
(4) Has no more than 99 full-time equivalent employees;
(5) Has its primary business activities in farming, fishing or forestry industries;
(6) Makes contributions in accordance with Title 26, section 1221; and
(7) Is determined by the department to have established no more than one small
business capital savings account.
C. "Program" means the Small Business Capital Savings Account Program established
in subsection 1.
D. "Small business capital savings account" means a savings account established in
the State by an eligible small business at a financial institution insured by the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation or a credit union insured by the National Credit Union
Administration.
3. Certification of businesses. The department shall certify up to 10 eligible small
businesses in each of the following industry categories:
A. Commercial agricultural production as defined in Title 36, section 2013, subsection
1, paragraph A;
B. Commercial fishing as defined in Title 36, section 2013, subsection 1, paragraph
B; or
C. Commercial wood harvesting as defined in Title 36, section 2013, subsection 1,
paragraph B-1.
If there are not 10 eligible small businesses in one of the industry categories specified in
paragraphs A to C, the department may certify eligible small businesses in one of the other
Page 1 - 132LR0720(01)

410 industry categories, but the total number of eligible small businesses certified may not
421 exceed 30. If there are more than 10 eligible small businesses in an industry category, the
432 department shall give priority in the order in which the businesses are determined to be
443 eligible.
4. Requirements for small business capital savings accounts; limitations. A small
business capital savings account must:
A. Have as its sole purpose the accumulation of capital to be used for capital
expenditures by the eligible small business;
B. Maintain a balance that does not exceed $250,000;
C. Provide that withdrawals from the account may be used only for capital
expenditures by the eligible small business; and
D. Provide that all funds in the account must be withdrawn within one year of the
dissolution of the business.
Contributions to a small business capital savings account may be made beginning on or
after January 1, 2026 and before January 1, 2030. Contributions may not be made to a small
business capital savings account after December 31, 2029.
5. Certification of withdrawals. An eligible small business shall notify the
department of all withdrawals from a small business capital savings account and provide
information required by the department to verify the use of the funds withdrawn. The
department shall certify annually all withdrawals made by an eligible small business for
capital expenditures.
6. Notification to the Bureau of Revenue Services. The department shall notify the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of Revenue Services
annually of all eligible small businesses certified under subsection 3 that continue to meet
the conditions of eligibility during the calendar year and withdrawals certified under
subsection 5 for eligible small businesses and provide any other information necessary for
the bureau to determine a taxpayer's eligibility for the tax deduction under Title 36, section
5122, subsection 2, paragraph AAA or Title 36, section 5200-A, subsection 2, paragraph
JJ.
7. Rules; other requirements. The department, in consultation with the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of Revenue Services, shall adopt routine
technical rules, as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A, to implement this
section. The department may establish any other guidelines or requirements necessary for
the operation of the program.
8. Report. The department shall submit a report to the joint standing committee of
the Legislature having jurisdiction over taxation matters by November 1, 2028 that includes
data demonstrating the extent of business participation in the program, including the
number of businesses certified as eligible for the tax deductions under Title 36, section
5122, subsection 2, paragraph AAA and Title 36, section 5200-A, subsection 2, paragraph
JJ, the amount of savings contributed by eligible small businesses to small business capital
savings accounts during each year and the amount of withdrawals by eligible small
businesses each year for capital expenditures. The report must contain the department's
analysis of the success of the program and a recommendation regarding whether the
Page 2 - 132LR0720(01)

414 program should be continued. The committee may submit legislation related to the report
425 to the First Regular Session of the 134th Legislature.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §191, sub-§2, ¶VVV is enacted to read:
VVV. The disclosure of information to the Department of Economic and Community
Development necessary for administration of the Small Business Capital Savings
Account Program pursuant to Title 5, section 13100-A.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§1, ¶QQ is enacted to read:
QQ. The amount of funds withdrawn from a small business capital savings account
established under Title 5, section 13100-A if the funds are not used during the tax year
for capital expenditures. This paragraph applies to withdrawals on or after January 1,
2026.
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§2, ¶AAA is enacted to read:
AAA. An amount up to $250,000 in the tax year contributed to a small business capital
savings account that meets the requirements established under Title 5, section
13100-A, subsection 4 by an eligible small business certified by the Department of
Economic and Community Development under Title 5, section 13100-A, subsection 3.
This paragraph applies to contributions made on or after January 1, 2026 and before
January 1, 2030.
Sec. 5. 36 MRSA §5200-A, sub-§1, ¶LL is enacted to read:
LL. The amount of funds withdrawn from a small business capital savings account
established under Title 5, section 13100-A if the funds are not used during the tax year
for capital expenditures. This paragraph applies to withdrawals on or after January 1,
2026.
Sec. 6. 36 MRSA §5200-A, sub-§2, ¶JJ is enacted to read:
JJ. An amount up to $250,000 in the tax year contributed to a small business capital
savings account that meets the requirements established under Title 5, section
13100-A, subsection 4 by an eligible small business certified by the Department of
Economic and Community Development under Title 5, section 13100-A, subsection 3.
This paragraph applies to contributions made on or after January 1, 2026 and before
January 1, 2030.